Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Part 2

Import Restrictions [Repealed]

44-2-201 — 44-2-205. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§44-2-201 —44-2-205 (Acts 1909, ch. 475, §§ 1-5; Shan. §§ 2789a18-2789a22; Code 1932, §§ 5037-5040, 5054; Acts 1947, ch. 46, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 44-417 — 44-421; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning health-related animal import restrictions, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 109, § 2.